Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.76.050

Voluntary change to electoral system—Use of population data regarding political parties.

In any change to its electoral system under RCW 29A.92.040 or preparation of a redistricting plan under RCW 29A.92.040, political subdivisions may use population data regarding political parties only to the extent necessary to ensure compliance with chapter 113, Laws of 2018 or federal law.

[ 2018 c 113 s 502.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 113: See RCW 29A.92.005 and 29A.92.900.